Massachusetts, session 194th, H4237.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority 
of the same, as follows: 
 
SECTION 1.  Notwithstanding any general or special law to the contrary, the amount of 
$7,463,000,000 is hereby appropriated for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026, to meet 
necessary obligations before the enactment of the general appropriation act for that fiscal year, 
for the maintenance and operations of the various departments, boards, commissions and 
institutions, including federal grant and Intragovernmental Service Fund expenditures, for other 
necessary services and for meeting certain requirements of law. This appropriation shall cease to 
be operative on the effective date of the general appropriation act and all actions taken under this 
section shall apply against that general appropriation act. All expenditures made under this 
section shall be consistent with appropriations made in the general appropriation act.  
SECTION 2.  The state treasurer shall make advance payments for some or all of periodic 
local reimbursement or assistance programs to any city, town, regional school district or 
independent agricultural and technical school that demonstrates an emergency cash shortfall, as 

of 2 13 certified by the commissioner of revenue and approved by the secretary of administration and 
finance, pursuant to guidelines issued by the secretary.  
SECTION 3.  Notwithstanding any general or special law to the contrary, unexpended 
balances of all capital accounts which otherwise would revert on June 30, 2025 but which are 
necessary to fund obligations during fiscal year 2026 are hereby reauthorized; provided, 
however, that the reauthorization shall terminate upon enactment of a capital account extension 
law.  
 SECTION 4.  This act shall take effect on June 30, 2025.